Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0503.
PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF MICHIGAN ENACT:
SUBPART 3
PLASTIC MICROBEADS
Sec. 14731. As used in this subpart:
(a) "Air care product" means a chemically formulated consumer
product labeled to indicate that the purpose of the product is to
enhance or condition the indoor environment by eliminating
unpleasant odors or freshening the air.
(b) "Cleaning product" means either of the following:
(i) An automotive product, general cleaning product, or floor
WAM S00540'25 (S-1) 3ivf9q


polish or floor maintenance product used primarily for janitorial,
household, or institutional cleaning purposes.
(ii) An air care product.
(c) "Department" means the department of environment, Great
Lakes, and energy.
(d) "Person" means an individual, partnership, corporation,
association, governmental entity, or other legal entity.
(e) "Personal care product" means an article intended to be
rubbed, poured, sprinkled, or sprayed on, introduced into, or
otherwise applied to the human body for cleansing, beautifying,
promoting attractiveness, or altering appearance, regardless of
whether the article is intended to be rinsed off, and any material
intended for use as a component of such an article. Personal care
product does not include a prescription drug.
(f) "Plastic microbead" means an intentionally added particle
of a solid polymeric material, to which a chemical additive or
other substance may have been added, measuring less than 5,000 μm
in all three dimensions. A plastic microbead does not include a
particle consisting of polymers that are derived in nature and have
not been chemically modified by a method other than hydrolysis.
Sec. 14732. A person shall not do any of the following:
(a) Beginning January 1, 2028, manufacture, offer for
promotional purposes, sell, or distribute a material that contains
plastic microbeads and is intended for use in this state. This
subdivision does not apply to a personal care product or cleaning
product.
(b) Beginning January 1, 2029, offer for promotional purposes,
sell, or distribute a personal care product or cleaning product
that contains plastic microbeads and is intended for use in this
WAM S00540'25 (S-1) 3ivf9q


state. This subdivision does not apply if the amount of plastic
microbeads is less than 1 part per million by weight.
Sec. 14733. (1) A person that violates section 14732 or a rule
promulgated to implement section 14732 is subject to a civil fine
of not more than $2,000.00 per day of violation. The prosecutor of
the county in which the violation occurred or the attorney general
may bring an action to collect a fine under this subsection. A fine
collected must be deposited in the state general fund.
(2) In determining the amount of a civil fine under subsection
(1), the court shall consider all of the following:
(a) The nature and extent of the violation.
(b) The number and severity of violations.
(c) The economic effect of the penalty on the violator.
(d) Whether the violator took good-faith measures to comply
with this subpart and when these measures were taken.
(e) The deterrent effect that the imposition of the fine would
have on both the violator and other persons regulated under section
14732.
(f) Any other factor that justice may require.
Sec. 14734. The department shall do all of the following:
(a) Administer and enforce this subpart.
(b) Provide on the department's publicly accessible website a
summary of the prohibitions of section 14732 and a means for
persons to report violations of this subpart.
(c) By July 1, 2030, and each year thereafter, prepare, post
on the department's website, and provide to the chairs of the
standing legislative committees and appropriations subcommittees
with primary responsibility for environmental protection issues a
report on both of the following:
WAM S00540'25 (S-1) 3ivf9q


(i) The enforcement of this subpart.
(ii) Progress in achieving the goals of section 14732.
Sec. 14735. Pursuant to the administrative procedures act of
1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328, the department may
promulgate rules to implement this subpart.
Final Page
WAM S00540'25 (S-1) 3ivf9q